Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-801
Issuance; purposes; limit; election required; power of county board.

The county board of any county of this state shall have authority to issue the bonds of such county in an amount not to exceed one and eight-tenths percent of the taxable valuation of the county and not to exceed one million dollars for the purpose of raising money to be advanced or loaned by such county to destitute and needy sufferers from cyclone, tornado, or destructive windstorm in such county. No such bonds shall be issued until the question of the issuing of the same has been submitted to the electors of the county at a general or special election as provided by sections 10-801 to 10-807.

Laws 1913, c. 229, § 1, p. 662;

R.S.1913, § 471;

C.S.1922, § 388;

C.S.1929, § 11-1001;

R.S.1943, § 10-801;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 25;

Laws 1980, LB 599, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 23.